District of Columbia statutes.
2-705

Use of official mail by officials-elect.

In addition to government employees and elected officials as defined in § 2-701, the following officials may mail materials as official mail:

(1)

The Mayor-elect;

(2)

The Chairman-elect and members-elect of the Council.

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-118, § 6, 23 DCR 8746
1973 Ed., § 1-1705.
1981 Ed., § 1-1705.